lexc-files/prs-num/volitive-of-fear.txt
!===============================
LEXICON VolitiveOfFear
!  person/number markers for
!      the volitive of fear mood
!===============================
!----------------------|-----------------------|----------------------|----------------------|
^[3Sg]:^n      Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^ma    Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^vek  Enclitic; ^[4Sg]:^mi   Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^ta     Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^mta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^fsi  Enclitic; ^[4Pl]:^meng Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^yek    Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^mtung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^ftek Enclitic; ^[4Du]:^mek  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^gkenka Enclitic;
!----------------------|-----------------------|----------------------|----------------------|


!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^agu        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^aki        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^akek        Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^atgu       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^atki       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^atkek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^agnegu     Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^agneki     Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^agnekek     Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^mkun       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^mki        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^mkek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^mteggu     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^mteki      Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^mtekek      Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^mtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^mtegneki   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^mtegnekek   Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^pegu       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^peki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^pekek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^pesigu     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^pesiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^pesikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^petegnegu  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^petegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^petegnekek  Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^minigu     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^miniki     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^minikek     Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^megteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^megteki    Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^megtekek    Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:^megnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^megneki    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^megnekek    Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga    Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^ankut      Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^ankung      Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                              |
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^penga      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^pekut      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^pekung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^pesinga    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^pesikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^pesikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^petegnenga Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^petegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^petegnekung Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^mininga    Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^minikut    Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^minikung    Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^megtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^megtekut   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^megtekung   Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^megnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^megneku    Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^megnekung   Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten       Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^asi        Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^mtek        Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                                              |
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^minisi     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^minitek     Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^minisi     Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^minitek     Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^minisi     Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^minitek     Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[3Sg.4Sg]:^atni       Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Pl.4Sg]:^atni       Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
^[3Du.4Sg]:^atni       Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Pl]:^asteng     Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Du]:^astek       Enclitic;
!------------------------------|--------------------------------|---------------------------------|
